tr: El dikiş iğnesi uç tipi: Yuvarlak uçlu; Küt; Kesme/deri; Ekstra sivri (mikroteks); Sivri; Konik; Kama; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de agulha para costura manual: Ponta de bola; Romba; De corte/para couro; Extra-afiada (microtex); Afiada; Cónica; Cunha; Outro
th: ชนิดของปลายเข็มเย็บมือ: หัวบอล; ปลายทู่; สำหรับตัด/หนัง; แหลมพิเศษ (ไมโครเท็กซ์); ปลายแหลม; ปลายเรียว; ปลายรูปลิ่ม; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ hrotu jehly pro ruční šití: Kulové; Tupé; Řezací / na kůži; Extra ostré (microtex); Ostré; Kuželové; Klínové; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de agulha para costura manual: Ponta redonda; Ponta romba; Corte/couro; Extra afiada (microtex); Afiada; Cônica; Em cunha; Outro
en: Hand-sewing needle point type: Ballpoint; Blunt; Cutting/leather; Extra-sharp (microtex); Sharp; Tapered; Wedge; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta konice igle za ročno šivanje: Zaokrožena konica; Topo; Rezilo/usnje; Zelo ostro (microtex); Ostro; Stožčasto; Klinasto; Drugo
vi: Loại đầu kim khâu tay: Đầu bi tròn; Đầu tù; Đầu cắt/may da; Siêu sắc (microtex); Đầu sắc; Đầu vát; Đầu mũi nêm; Khác
fr: Type de pointe d’aiguille à coudre à la main: À bout rond; Émoussée; Tranchante/cuir; Très pointue (microtex); Pointue; Effilée; Biseautée; Autre
el: Τύπος μύτης βελόνας για ράψιμο στο χέρι: Μπίλιας; Αμβλεία; Коπής/δέρματος; Εξαιρετικά αιχμηρή (microtex); Αιχμηρή; Κωνική; Σφηνοειδής; Άλλο
nb: Håndsying av nålespisstype: Kulespiss; Butt; Skjær/skinn; Ekstra spiss (microtex); Spiss; Avsmalnende; Kile; Annet
sv: Typ av nålspetstyp för handsömnad: Kulspets; Trubbig; Skärande/läder; Extra vass (microtex); Vass; Avsmalnande; Kilformad; Övrigt
es: Tipo de punta de aguja para coser a mano: Punta de bola; Punta roma; De corte/cuero; Extra afilada (microtex); Afilada; Cónica; De cuña; Otra
bg-BG: Тип връх на игла за ръчно шиене: Сферичен връх; Тъп връх; Режещ/за кожа; Много остър (микротекс); Остър; Скосен; Клиновиден; Друго
ko: 손바느질용 바늘 끝 타입: 볼포인트; 무딘 팁; 커팅/가죽용; 엑스트라 샤프(마이크로텍스); 샤프; 테이퍼; 웨지; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul cu vârf de ac pentru cusut manual: Vârf cu bilă; Bont; Tăiere/piele; Foarte ascuțit (microtex); Ascuțit; Conic; Pană; Altele
nl: Handnaainaald punt type: Ballpoint; Stomp; Snijdend/leer; Extra scherp (microtex); Scherp; Taps; Wig; Overig
lt-LT: Rankinio siuvimo adatos smaigalio tipas: Apvalus; Bukas; Pjovimo / odos; Labai smailus („microtex“); Smailus; Smailėjantis; Pleišto; Kita
ru: Тип острия иглы для ручного шитья: Закругленное острие; Тупое; Режущее/для кожи; Сверхострое (микротекс); Острое; Конусное; Клиновидное; Другое
zh-TW: 手縫針針尖類型: 圓頭; 鈍頭; 切割/皮革用; 特尖 (細緻布料用); 尖頭; 錐狀; 楔狀; 其他
hu: Kézi varrótűhegy típusa: Gömbhegyű; Tompa; Vágó / bőrvarró; Extra hegyes (microtex); Hegyes; Kúpos; Ék alakú; Egyéb
fi: Neulan kärjen tyyppi käsinompelussa: Pallokärki; Tylppä; Leikkaava/nahka; Erittäin terävä (microtex); Terävä; Kapeneva; Kiilakärki; Muu
pl: Typ czubka igły do szycia ręcznego: Z kulką; Tępe; Tnące/do skóry; Bardzo ostre (microtex); Ostre; Stożkowe; Klinowe; Inne
da: Spidstype på håndsynål: Kuglespids; Sløv; Skærende/læder; Ekstra skarp (microtex); Skarp; Tilspidset; Kile; Andet
it: ago da cucito a mano: Punta a sfera; Smussata; Tagliente/per pelle; Extra affilata (microtex); Affilata; Conica; A cuneo; Altro
ja: 手縫い針ポイントタイプ: ボールポイント; ブラント; カッティング/レザー; エクストラシャープ (マイクロテックス); シャープ; テーパード; ウェッジ; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta vrha igle za ručno šivanje: S kuglastim vrhom; Tupi vrh; Za rezanje / za kožu; Iznimno oštar vrh (microtex); Oštri vrh; Suženi vrh; Klinasti vrh; Ostalo
zh-CN: 手缝针针尖类型: 圆头; 钝头; 割皮/皮革; 特尖（微纤）; 尖头; 锥形; 楔形; 其他
sk-SK: Typ hrotu ihly na ručné šitie: Guľová špička; Tupá; Rezacia/na kožu; Extra ostrá (microtex); Ostrá; Zúžená; Klinová; Iné
de: Typ der Handnähnadelspitze: Kugelspitze; Stumpf; Schneidend/Leder; Extraspitz (Microtex); Spitz; Verjüngt; Keil; Sonstige